Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1306

Statement of conversion—Effective date of conversion.

(1) A statement of conversion must be executed by the converting entity and delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

(2) A statement of conversion must contain:

(a) The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converting entity;

(b) The name of the converted entity;

(c) If the statement of conversion is not to be effective upon filing, the later date and time on which it will become effective, which may not be more than ninety days after the date of filing;

(d) A statement that the plan of conversion was approved in accordance with this subchapter; and

(e) The public organic record of the converted entity, as an attachment.

(3) In addition to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, a statement of conversion may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

(4) The public organic record of the converted entity must satisfy the requirements of the law of this state, except that the public organic record does not need to be executed and may omit any provision that is not required to be included in a restatement of the public organic record.

(5) A plan of conversion that is executed by a converting entity and meets all the requirements of subsection (2) of this section may be delivered to the secretary of state for filing instead of a statement of conversion and on filing has the same effect. If a plan of conversion is filed as provided in this subsection, references in this subchapter to a statement of conversion refer to the plan of conversion filed under this subsection.

(6) A statement of conversion is effective on the date and time of filing or the later date and time specified in the statement of conversion.

(7) The conversion becomes effective when the statement of conversion is effective.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1306.]